Washington statutes.
RCW 39.84.040

Board of directors of public corporation.

The ordinance creating a public corporation shall include provisions establishing a board of directors to govern the affairs of the public corporation, what constitutes a quorum of the board of directors, and how the public corporation shall conduct its affairs.

[ 1981 c 300 s 4.]